Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 41

Regional Retail Tourism Development District Act

7-41-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Regional Retail Tourism Development District Act.”

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-102. Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to increase tourism and the competitiveness of this state with bordering states by empowering local governments to encourage the development of extraordinary retail or tourism facilities, including shopping, recreational, and other activities.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Base tax revenues” means the revenues generated from the collection of state sales and use taxes from all businesses within the applicable regional retail tourism development district as of the end of the fiscal year of this state immediately prior to the year in which the municipality or industrial development corporation is entitled to receive an allocation of tax revenue pursuant to this chapter. In no event shall the apportionment pursuant to this chapter be adjusted to reduce the economic benefit to the municipality as is provided in this chapter;

“Best interests of the state” means a determination by the commissioner of revenue, with approval by the commissioner of economic and community development, that:

The economic development project or extraordinary retail or tourism facility within the district is a result of the special allocation and distribution of state sales tax provided for in § 7-41-106; and

The district is a result of the project or extraordinary retail or tourism facility;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue;

“Cost” means all costs of an economic development project in a district incurred by the municipality or industrial development corporation, including, but not limited to, the cost of developing the district, as well as acquisition, design, construction, renovation, improvement, demolition, and relocation of any improvements; the cost of labor, materials, and equipment; the cost of all lands, property rights, easements, and franchises required; financing charges, interest, and debt service prior to, during, or after construction; the cost of issuing bonds in connection with any financing; cost of plans and specifications, services, and estimates of costs and of revenue; cost of direct or indirect assistance, including funds for location assistance; cost of site preparation, engineering, accounting, and legal services; all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of such acquisitions or construction; salaries, overhead, and other costs of the municipality or industrial development corporation allocated to the project, including new development or subsequent phases of the project to be completed within the thirty-year period established in § 7-41-104(d), and administrative, legal, and engineering expenses and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to such acquisition, design, construction, renovation, demolition, relocation, or the financing thereof, including the costs incurred by a municipality or industrial development corporation relating to the development of an extraordinary retail or tourism facility within two (2) years prior to the municipality's designation of the proposed regional retail tourism development district for such project;

“Economic development project” or “project” means the provision of direct or indirect financial assistance, including funds for location assistance, to an extraordinary retail or tourism facility and other retail or tourism facilities developed to accompany the extraordinary retail or tourism facility in a regional retail tourism development district by a municipality or an industrial development corporation, including, but not limited to, the purchase, lease, grant, construction, reconstruction, improvement, or other acquisition or conveyance of land, buildings, equipment, or other infrastructure; public works improvements essential to the location of an extraordinary retail or tourism facility and other retail or tourism facilities developed to accompany the extraordinary retail or tourism facility; payments for professional services contracts necessary for a municipality or industrial development corporation to implement a plan or project; the provision of direct loans or grants for land, buildings, or infrastructure; and loan guarantees securing the cost of land, buildings, location assistance, or infrastructure in an amount not to exceed the revenue that may be derived from the sales and use tax transferred to the municipality as provided in this chapter. It also includes development of parks, plazas, sidewalks, access ways, roads, drives, bridges, ramps, landscaping, signage, parking lots, parking structures, and other public improvements constructed or renovated by the municipality or an industrial development corporation in connection with the project in the district and any related infrastructure and utility improvements for public or private peripheral development for the district that is constructed, renovated, or installed by the municipality or an industrial development corporation;

“Extraordinary retail or tourism facility” means a single store, series of stores, or other public tourism facility or facilities located within a regional retail tourism development district, and includes retail or other public tourism facilities that are reasonably anticipated to draw at least one million (1,000,000) visitors a year upon completion. The extraordinary retail or tourism facility must reasonably be expected to require a capital investment of at least twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), including land, buildings, and site preparation costs, and must reasonably be anticipated to remit at least two million dollars ($2,000,000) in state sales and use tax annually when completed;

“Industrial development corporation” means a corporation created or authorized by a municipality or county pursuant to chapter 53 of this title;

“Municipal governing body” means the city council, city commission, or board of mayor and aldermen of a city;

“Municipality” means an incorporated city located in this state; and

“Regional retail tourism development district” or “district” means one (1) or more parcels of real property located within a county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-two thousand nine hundred (122,900) nor more than one hundred twenty-three thousand (123,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent census, and which some boundary of the district is no more than one-half (1/2) mile from an existing federally designated interstate exit, is no more than twenty (20) miles from the state border of two (2) neighboring states as measured by straight line, is no larger than a total area of nine hundred fifty (950) acres, and is designated as a regional retail tourism development district by a municipal ordinance and certified by the commissioner.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-104. Requirements to receive apportionment of state sales and use taxes — Certification of district — Apportionment and distribution of state sales and use taxes to municipality.

To receive the apportionment of state sales and use taxes as provided in this chapter, the following requirements must be met:

A municipal legislative body must adopt an ordinance designating the boundaries of the regional retail tourism development district. A municipality shall not contain more than one (1) such district;

The municipality must file a certified copy of the ordinance with the commissioner along with a request for certification of the district. The request must include a master development plan for the proposed district containing such information as may be reasonably required by the commissioner;

The commissioner shall promptly review the request to confirm that the proposed boundaries of the proposed regional retail tourism development district do not exceed the maximum size set forth in this chapter. If the commissioner determines that the boundaries of the proposed regional retail tourism development district exceed the area allowed by this chapter, then the commissioner may adjust or reduce the boundaries of the proposed district in consultation with the municipality. In reviewing the request, the commissioner shall inform the commissioners of economic and community development and tourist development of the pending request; and

If the commissioner, with approval by the commissioner of economic and community development, determines that the special allocation of state sales tax, as authorized by § 7-41-106, is in the best interests of the state, then the commissioner shall approve the request and certify the district. Upon certification of the district, the commissioner shall provide prompt notice of the certification to the commissioner of economic and community development, the commissioner of tourist development, and the requesting municipal governing body.

Upon certification of the district, state sales and use taxes must be apportioned and distributed to the municipality as provided in this chapter.

The apportionment and distribution of state sales and use taxes to the municipality as provided in this chapter must commence at the beginning of the fiscal year after the certification of the district. Prior to the beginning of that fiscal year, and on an annual basis thereafter, the municipality shall submit to the commissioner a summary of the cost of the economic development project with supporting documentation, certified by the chief financial officer of the municipality, which must include the cost of any new phases or additional development of the project to be completed within the thirty-year time limitation established in subsection (d). The commissioner shall review the cost certification to determine whether state sales and use taxes, in the amount determined by the commissioner, must be apportioned and distributed to the municipality pursuant to this chapter and shall notify the department of economic and community development of the determination.

Additional development or new phases of a project within a certified district shall not be initiated after the expiration of twenty (20) years following certification of the district. The certified district must be dissolved following the expiration of thirty (30) years, or upon the date on which the cost of the project has been fully paid, whichever occurs first. The thirty-year period in this subsection (d) runs concurrently with the time limitation established in § 7-41-106.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-105. Annual adjustments to sales and use tax revenues collected in district.

The department of revenue shall make annual adjustments to the sales and use tax revenues collected in the district within ninety (90) days of the end of each fiscal year. The annual adjustments are effective immediately upon notification of the adjustment from the department of revenue to the municipality or industrial development corporation.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 6.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-106. Apportionment and distribution if extraordinary retail or tourism facility or project in certified district.

Notwithstanding the allocations provided for in § 67-6-103(a), if a municipality or industrial development corporation finances, constructs, leases, equips, renovates, assists, incents, or acquires an extraordinary retail or tourism facility or a project in a certified district, then seventy-five percent (75%) of state sales and use tax collected in the district in excess of base tax revenues must be apportioned and distributed to the municipality in an amount equal to the incremental increase in state sales and use taxes derived from the sale of goods, products, and services within the district in excess of base tax revenues.

Apportionment and distribution according to subsection (a) must continue for a period of thirty (30) years, or until the date on which the entire cost of the economic development project, including any principal and interest on indebtedness, including refunding indebtedness of the municipality or industrial development corporation related to the development of the project, are fully paid, whichever occurs first. Following the expiration of this thirty-year period, or upon the date on which such cost has been fully paid, whichever is sooner, all amounts that would have otherwise been distributed to the municipality or retained in lieu of distribution shall be allocated as provided elsewhere without regard to this chapter.

Tax revenue distributed to the municipality pursuant to this chapter is for the exclusive use of the municipality or the industrial development corporation formally designated by the municipality for payment of the cost of the economic development project, including principal and interest on indebtedness, including refunding indebtedness of the municipality or industrial development corporation related to the development of the project. The department of revenue shall apportion the payment to the municipality within ninety (90) days of the end of each fiscal year for which the municipality is entitled to receive an allocation and payment pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 7.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-107. Delegation to industrial development corporation.

An eligible municipality in which a district is located is authorized to delegate to any industrial development corporation within the county or counties where the municipality is located the authority to carry out all or part of the project, to issue revenue bonds to finance a project within a district, and to incur cost for the project. The municipality may enter into an agreement with an industrial development corporation in which the municipality agrees to promptly pay to the industrial development corporation the tax revenues received pursuant to this chapter sufficient to service the repayment of the bonds and costs incurred by the industrial development corporation for the project. Upon receipt, that portion of tax revenues must be held in trust by the municipality for the benefit of the industrial development corporation.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 8.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-108. Bonds, notes, refunding bonds, or other indebtedness relative to cost of economic development project.

Any bonds, notes, refunding bonds, or other indebtedness relative to the cost of an economic development project must not be issued for a term longer than thirty (30) years, and the municipality or industrial development corporation may pledge all proceeds or taxes it receives pursuant to this chapter to the payment of principal and interest on the bonds, notes, or other indebtedness. The thirty-year period in this section runs concurrently with the time limitation established in §7-41-106.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 9.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-109. Debt amortization schedule for bonds.

Prior to the issuance of any bonds to finance the cost of an economic development project that will be repaid in whole or part from apportionments under this chapter, the municipality or industrial development corporation issuing the bonds shall submit a proposed debt amortization schedule for the bonds to the commissioner for approval. The schedule must show the anticipated contribution to be made to the annual debt service for the bonds from the apportionment of sales and use taxes pursuant to this chapter and all other sources. After the date of issuance of the bonds, the municipality shall continue to contribute each year thereafter until the bonds are retired or a sufficient sinking fund has been established for their retirement.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 10.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-110. Limitations, conditions, or provision of incentives or financial support in district.

A municipality may, including through an industrial development corporation, limit, condition, or provide incentives or financial support in the district as it deems appropriate, including the requirement that the benefited property owners participate in the repayment of indebtedness due to district formation in an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the property tax for the real property owned by the property owner in the district each year, for the length of time as the municipality receives an appropriation of sales and use tax in accordance with this chapter and the property owner provides a lien on the property for such repayment. A municipality shall not provide financial assistance for the location or relocation of existing retailers located within a fifteen-mile radius of the district, if the existing location is within this state, unless the sales floor space is increased by thirty-five percent (35%) or more from that of the existing store. A municipality may allocate some or all of the incremental increase in property tax revenue directly as a result of the development within the district to pay for costs associated with the district formation, economic development projects, or extraordinary retail or tourism projects within the district.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 11.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

7-41-111. Exercise of powers and rights granted by chapter.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the municipality and the industrial development corporation may exercise all power and rights, express or implied, granted by this chapter.

Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 12.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 498, § 15. July 1, 2019.

Chapters 42-50

[Reserved]